Mississippi, session 2026, HB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-49-5, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-49-5.  (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a)  "Health care" means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect an individual's physical or mental condition. (b)  "Health care practitioner" means an individual licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession. (2)  The board or agency that licenses, certifies or registers a health care practitioner: (a)  May not reprimand, sanction, revoke or threaten to revoke a license, certificate or registration of a health care practitioner for exercising his or her constitutional right of free speech, including, but not limited to, speech through the use of a social media platform, unless the board or agency proves beyond a reasonable doubt that the speech used by the health care practitioner led to the direct physical harm of a person with whom the health care practitioner had a practitioner-patient relationship within the three (3) years immediately preceding the physical harm; and (b)  Must provide a health care practitioner with any complaints received for which revocation actions may be in order within seven (7) days after receipt of such complaint. SECTION 2.  Section 73-6-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-6-19.  (1)  The board shall refuse to grant a certificate of licensure to any applicant or may cancel, revoke or suspend the certificate upon the finding of any of the following facts regarding the applicant or licensed practitioner: (a)  Failure to comply with the rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners; (b)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any of the rules and regulations of the State Board of Health pursuant to this chapter with regard to the operation and use of x-rays; (c)  Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license; (d)  Addiction to the use of alcohol, narcotic drugs, or anything which would seriously interfere with the competent performance of his professional duties; (e)  Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony, other than manslaughter or any violation of the United States Internal Revenue Code; (f)  Unprofessional and unethical conduct; (g)  Contraction of a contagious disease which may be carried for a prolonged period; (h)  Failure to report to the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the county attorney any case wherein there are reasonable grounds to believe that a child or vulnerable adult has been abused by its parent or person responsible for such person's welfare; (i)  Advising a patient to use drugs, prescribing or providing drugs for a patient, or advising a patient not to use a drug prescribed by a licensed physician or dentist; (j)  Professional incompetency in the practice of chiropractic; (k)  Having disciplinary action taken by his peers within any professional chiropractic association or society; (l)  Offering to accept or accepting payment for services rendered by assignment from any third-party payor after offering to accept or accepting whatever the third-party payor covers as payment in full, if the effect of the offering or acceptance is to eliminate or give the impression of eliminating the need for payment by an insured of any required deductions applicable in the policy of the insured; (m)  Associating his practice with any chiropractor who does not hold a valid chiropractic license in Mississippi, or teach chiropractic manipulation to nonqualified persons under Section 73-6-13; (n)  Failure to make payment on chiropractic student loans; (o)  Failure to follow record-keeping requirements prescribed in Section 73-6-18; (p)  If the practitioner is certified to provide animal chiropractic treatment, failure to follow guidelines approved by the Mississippi Board of Veterinary Medicine; or (q)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  Any holder of such certificate or any applicant therefor against whom is preferred any of the designated charges shall be furnished a copy of the complaint and shall receive a formal hearing in Jackson, Mississippi, before the board, at which time he may be represented by counsel and examine witnesses.  The board is authorized to administer oaths as may be necessary for the proper conduct of any such hearing.  In addition, the board is authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers.  The process issued by the board shall extend to all parts of the state.  Where in any proceeding before the board any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify, or shall refuse to produce any books and papers, the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (3)  In addition to any other investigators the board employs, the board shall appoint one or more licensed chiropractors to act for the board in investigating the conduct relating to the competency of a chiropractor, whenever disciplinary action is being considered for professional incompetence and unprofessional conduct. (4)  Whenever the board finds any person unqualified to practice chiropractic because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, after a hearing has been conducted as prescribed by this section, the board may enter an order imposing one or more of the following: (a)  Deny his application for a license or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (b)  Administer a public or private reprimand; (c)  Suspend, limit or restrict his license or other authorization to practice chiropractic for up to five (5) years; (d)  Revoke or cancel his license or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (e)  Require him to submit to care, counseling or treatment by physicians or chiropractors designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued or renewal of licensure or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (f)  Require him to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board; or (g)  Require him to practice under the direction of a chiropractor designated by the board for a specified period of time. (5)  Any person whose application for a license or whose license to practice chiropractic has been cancelled, revoked or suspended by the board within thirty (30) days from the date of such final decision shall have the right of a de novo appeal to the circuit court of his county of residence or the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  If there is an appeal, such appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the circuit court, act as a supersedeas.  The circuit court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the circuit judge, be tried in vacation.  Either party shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court as provided by law from any decision of the circuit court. (6)  In a proceeding conducted under this section by the board for the revocation, suspension or cancellation of a license to practice chiropractic, after a hearing has been conducted as prescribed by this section, the board shall have the power and authority for the grounds stated in subsection (1) of this section, with the exception of paragraph (c) thereof, to assess and levy upon any person licensed to practice chiropractic in the state a monetary penalty in lieu of such revocation, suspension or cancellation, as follows: (a)  For the first violation, a monetary penalty of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation. (b)  For the second and each subsequent violation, a monetary penalty of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each violation. The power and authority of the board to assess and levy such monetary penalties under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations.  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section to the circuit court under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided for in this section for appeals from an adverse ruling, or order, or decision of the board.  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired, and an appeal of the assessment and levy of such a monetary penalty shall act as a supersedeas. (7)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (8)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 3.  Section 73-9-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-61.  (1)  Upon satisfactory proof, and in accordance with statutory provisions elsewhere set out for such hearings and protecting the rights of the accused as well as the public, the State Board of Dental Examiners may deny the issuance or renewal of a license or may revoke or suspend the license of any licensed dentist or dental hygienist practicing in the State of Mississippi, or take any other action in relation to the license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances, for any of the following reasons: (a)  Misrepresentation in obtaining a license, or attempting to obtain, obtaining, attempting to renew or renewing a license or professional credential by making any material misrepresentation, including the signing in his or her professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he or she makes or signs the certificate. (b)  Willful violation of any of the rules or regulations duly promulgated by the board, or of any of the rules or regulations duly promulgated by the appropriate dental licensure agency of another state or jurisdiction. (c)  Being impaired in the ability to practice dentistry or dental hygiene with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition. (d)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any prescriptive medication or drug outside the course of legitimate professional dental practice. (e)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (f)  Practicing incompetently or negligently, regardless of whether there is actual harm to the patient. (g)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in any jurisdiction that relates to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (h)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a felony in any jurisdiction, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (i)  Delegating professional responsibilities to a person who is not qualified by training, experience or licensure to perform them. (j)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in that jurisdiction or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by the licensing authority that prevents or restricts practice in that jurisdiction, a certified copy of the disciplinary order or action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (k)  Surrender of a license or authorization to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in another state or jurisdiction when the board has reasonable cause to believe that the surrender is made to avoid or in anticipation of a disciplinary action. (l)  Any unprofessional conduct to be determined by the board on a case-by-case basis, which shall include, but not be restricted to, the following: (i)  Committing any crime involving moral turpitude. (ii)  Practicing deceit or other fraud upon the public. (iii)  Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene under a false or assumed name. (iv)  Advertising that is false, deceptive or misleading. (v)  Announcing a specialized practice shall be considered advertising that tends to deceive or mislead the public unless the dentist announcing as a specialist conforms to other statutory provisions and the duly promulgated rules or regulations of the board pertaining to practice of dentistry in the State of Mississippi. (m)  Failure to provide and maintain reasonable sanitary facilities and conditions or failure to follow board rules regarding infection control. (n)  Committing any act which would constitute sexual misconduct upon a patient or upon ancillary staff.  For purposes of this subsection, the term sexual misconduct means: (i)  Use of the licensee-patient relationship to engage or attempt to engage the patient in sexual activity; or (ii)  Conduct of a licensee that is intended to intimidate, coerce, influence or trick any person employed by or for the licensee in a dental practice or educational setting for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity or activity intended for the sexual gratification of the licensee. (o)  Violation of a lawful order of the board previously entered in a disciplinary or licensure hearing; failure to cooperate with any lawful request or investigation by the board; or failure to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board. (p)  Willful, obstinate and continuing refusal to cooperate with the board in observing its rules and regulations in promptly paying all legal license or other fees required by law. (q)  Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene while the person's license is suspended. (r)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  In lieu of revocation of a license as provided for above, the board may suspend the license of the offending dentist or dental hygienist, suspend the sedation permit of the offending dentist, or take any other action in relation to his or her license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances. (3)  When a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene is revoked or suspended by the board, the board may, in its discretion, stay the revocation or suspension and simultaneously place the licensee on probation upon the condition that the licensee shall not violate the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene and shall not violate the rules and regulations of the board and shall not violate any terms in relation to his or her license as may be set by the board. (4)  In a proceeding conducted under this section by the board for the denial, revocation or suspension of a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene, the board shall have the power and authority for the grounds stated for that denial, revocation or suspension, and in addition thereto or in lieu of that denial, revocation or suspension may assess and levy upon any person licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in the State of Mississippi, a monetary penalty, as follows: (a)  For the first violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), (l), (m), (n), (o) or (q) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (b)  For the second violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), (l), (m), (n), (o) or (q) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (c)  For the third and any subsequent violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), (l), (m), (n), (o) or (q) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (d)  For any violation of any of paragraphs (a) through (q) of subsection (1) of this section, those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation or suspension, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigators. (5)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy monetary penalties under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (6)  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided elsewhere for appeals from an adverse ruling, order or decision of the board. (7)  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired.  In the event of an appeal, the appeal shall act as a supersedeas. (8)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of those penalties under this section or may be paid sooner if the licensee elects. With the exception of subsection (4)(d) of this section, monetary penalties collected by the board under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the General Fund of the State Treasury.  Any monies collected by the board under subsection (4)(d) of this section shall be deposited into the special fund operating account of the board. (9)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee when due under this section, the board shall have power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, and if the licensee is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, the proceedings shall be in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (10)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (11)  All grounds for disciplinary action, including imposition of fines and assessment of costs as enumerated above, shall also apply to any other license or permit issued by the board under this chapter or regulations duly adopted by the board. (12)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 4.  Section 73-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-29.  (1)  The board shall have power to revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any license issued by the board, or to revoke or suspend any privilege to practice, or to deny an application for a license, or to fine, place on probation and/or discipline a licensee, in any manner specified in this article, upon proof that such person: (a)  Has committed fraud or deceit in securing or attempting to secure such license; (b)  Has been convicted of a felony, or a crime involving moral turpitude or has had accepted by a court a plea of nolo contendere to a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude (a certified copy of the judgment of the court of competent jurisdiction of such conviction or pleas shall be prima facie evidence of such conviction); (c)  Has negligently or willfully acted in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the persons under the licensee's care; (d)  Has had a license or privilege to practice as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, has voluntarily surrendered such license or privilege to practice in any jurisdiction, has been placed on probation as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction or has been placed under a disciplinary order(s) in any manner as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction, (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action); (e)  Has negligently or willfully practiced nursing in a manner that fails to meet generally accepted standards of such nursing practice; (f)  Has negligently or willfully violated any order, rule or regulation of the board pertaining to nursing practice or licensure; (g)  Has falsified or in a repeatedly negligent manner made incorrect entries or failed to make essential entries on records; (h)  Is addicted to or dependent on alcohol or other habit-forming drugs or is a habitual user of narcotics, barbiturates, amphetamines, hallucinogens, or other drugs having similar effect, or has misappropriated any medication; (i)  Has a physical, mental or emotional condition that renders the licensee unable to perform nursing services or duties with reasonable skill and safety; (j)  Has engaged in any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character from that specified in this article, that would constitute a crime as defined in Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, and that relates to such person's employment as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse; (k)  Engages in conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public; (l)  Engages in any unprofessional conduct as identified by the board in its rules; (m)  Has violated any provision of this article; (n)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners; or (o)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  When the board finds any person unqualified because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, it may enter an order imposing one or more of the following penalties: (a)  Denying application for a license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (b)  Administering a reprimand; (c)  Suspending or restricting the license or other authorization to practice as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse for up to two (2) years without review; (d)  Revoking the license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (e)  Requiring the disciplinee to submit to care, counseling or treatment by persons and/or agencies approved or designated by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (f)  Requiring the disciplinee to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice; (g)  Requiring the disciplinee to practice under the supervision of a registered nurse for a specified period of time; or (h)  Imposing a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  If the public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and the board incorporates a finding to that effect in an order, the board may order summary suspension of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined by the board. (5)  The board may establish by rule an alternative to discipline program for licensees who have an impairment as a result of substance abuse or a mental health condition, which program shall include at least the following components: (a)  Participation in the program is voluntary with the licensee, and the licensee must enter the program before the board holds a disciplinary action hearing regarding the licensee; (b)  The full cost of participation in the program, including the cost of any care, counseling, treatment and/or education received by the licensee, shall be borne by the licensee; (c)  All of the procedures and records regarding the licensee's participation in the program shall be confidential, shall not be disclosed and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983; and (d)  A licensee may not participate in the program more often than one (1) time during any period of five (5) years or such longer period as set by the board. (6)  A nurse practitioner who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. (7)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 5.  Section 73-19-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-19-23.  (1)  (a)  The board shall refuse to grant a certificate of licensure to any applicant and may cancel, revoke or suspend the operation of any certificate by it granted for any or all of the following reasons:  unprofessional and unethical conduct or the conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude, habitual intemperance in the use of ardent spirits, or stimulants, narcotics, or any other substance that impairs the intellect and judgment to such an extent as to incapacitate one for the performance of the duties of an optometrist.  The certificate of licensure of any person can be revoked for violating any section of this chapter. (b)  The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on licensure applicants and on licensees whose licenses are subject to investigation. (i)  The applicant or licensee shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant or licensee shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form or manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (ii)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or licensee or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (iii)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant or licensee, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (iv)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant or licensee, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant or licensee. (2)  The board shall further be authorized to take disciplinary action against a licensee for any unlawful acts, which shall include violations of regulations promulgated by the board, as well as the following acts: (a)  Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring an optometric license or in connection with applying for or procuring periodic renewal of an optometric license. (b)  Cheating on or attempting to subvert the optometric licensing examination(s). (c)  The conviction of a felony in this state or any other jurisdiction, or the entry of a guilty or nolo contendere plea to a felony charge. (d)  The conviction of a felony as defined by federal law, or the entry of a guilty or nolo contendere plea to a felony charge. (e)  Conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (f)  Making a false or misleading statement regarding his or her skill or the efficacy or value of the medicine, device, treatment or remedy prescribed by him or her or used at his or her direction in the treatment of any disease or other condition. (g)  Willfully or negligently violating the confidentiality between doctor and patient, except as required by law. (h)  Negligence or gross incompetence in the practice of optometry as determined by the board. (i)  Being found to be a person with mental illness or with an intellectual disability by any court of competent jurisdiction. (j)  The use of any false, fraudulent, deceptive or misleading statement in any document connected with the practice of optometry. (k)  Aiding or abetting the practice of optometry by an unlicensed, incompetent or impaired person. (l)  Commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct or exploitation related to the licensee's practice of optometry. (m)  Being addicted or habituated to a drug or intoxicant. (n)  Violating any state or federal law or regulation relating to a drug legally classified as a controlled substance. (o)  Obtaining any fee by fraud, deceit or misrepresentation. (p)  Disciplinary action of another state or jurisdiction against a licensee or other authorization to practice optometry based upon acts or conduct by the licensee similar to acts or conduct that would constitute grounds for action as defined in this chapter, a certified copy of the record of the action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being conclusive evidence thereof. (q)  Failure to report to the board the relocation of his or her office in or out of the jurisdiction, or to furnish floor plans as required by regulation. (r)  Violation of any provision(s) of the Optometry Practice Act or the rules and regulations of the board or of an action, stipulation or agreement of the board. (s)  To advertise in a manner that tends to deceive, mislead or defraud the public. (t)  The designation of any person licensed under this chapter, other than by the terms "optometrist," "Doctor of Optometry" or "O.D.," which shall include any violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (u)  To knowingly submit or cause to be submitted any misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation on a claim form, bill or statement. (v)  To practice or attempt to practice optometry while his or her license is suspended. (3)  Any person who is a holder of a certificate of licensure or who is an applicant for examination for a certificate of licensure, against whom is preferred any charges, shall be furnished by the board with a copy of the complaint and shall have a hearing in Jackson, Mississippi, before the board, at which hearing he may be represented by counsel.  At the hearing, witnesses may be examined for and against the accused respecting  those charges, and the hearing orders or appeals will be conducted according to the procedure now provided in Section 73-25-27.  The suspension of a certificate of licensure by reason of the use of stimulants or narcotics may be removed when the holder of the certificate has been adjudged by the board to be cured and capable of practicing optometry. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (5)  A licensee who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. (6)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 6.  Section 73-21-97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-97.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend, reprimand, revoke or restrict the license, registration or permit of any person, or may impose a monetary penalty, upon one or more of the following grounds: (a)  Unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules and regulations of the board; (b)  Incapacity of a nature that prevents a pharmacist or intern/extern from engaging in the practice of pharmacy or a pharmacy technician from engaging in or providing nonjudgmental technical services in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, confidence and safety to the public; (c)  Being found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of one or more of the following: (i)  A felony; (ii)  Any act involving moral turpitude or gross immorality; or (iii)  Violation of pharmacy or drug laws of this state or rules or regulations pertaining thereto, or of statutes, rules or regulations of any other state or the federal government; (d)  Fraud or intentional misrepresentation by a licensee, registrant or permit holder in securing the issuance or renewal of a license or permit; (e)  Engaging or aiding and abetting an individual to engage in the practice of pharmacy without a license; (f)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter; (g)  Failure to comply with lawful orders of the board; (h)  Negligently or willfully acting in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the public; (i)  Addiction to or dependence on alcohol or controlled substances or the unauthorized use or possession of controlled substances; (j)  Misappropriation of any prescription drug; (k)  Being found guilty by the licensing agency in another state of violating the statutes, rules or regulations of that jurisdiction; (l)  The unlawful or unauthorized possession of a controlled substance; (m)  Willful failure to submit drug monitoring information or willful submission of incorrect dispensing information as required by the Prescription Monitoring Program under Section 73-21-127; (n)  Failure to obtain the license, registration or permit required by this chapter; or (o)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  In lieu of suspension, revocation or restriction of a license, registration or permit as provided for above, the board may warn, reprimand or issue a citation to the offending licensee, registrant or permit holder. (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license, registration or permit of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license, registration or permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 7.  Section 73-23-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-59.  (1)  Licensees subject to this chapter shall conduct their activities, services and practice in accordance with this chapter and any rules promulgated pursuant hereto.  The board, upon satisfactory proof and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board, may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license hereunder, or revoke or suspend any privilege to practice,  censure or reprimand any licensee, restrict or limit a license, and take any other action in relation to a license or privilege to practice as the board may deem proper under the circumstances upon any of the following grounds: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same or obtaining a privilege to practice; (d)  Being convicted of any crime which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is misstatement, fraud or dishonesty; (e)  Having been convicted of or pled guilty to a felony in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country.  Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere; (f)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally or by others working under the licensee's supervision due to the licensee's deliberate or negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established; (g)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (h)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (i)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (j)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (k)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (l)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this chapter or privilege to practice is required under Section 73-23-101; (m)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a license or privilege to practice by the board; (n)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (o)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (p)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices; (q)  For treating or attempting to treat ailments or other health conditions of human beings other than by physical therapy as authorized by this chapter; (r)  Except as authorized in Section 73-23-35(3) and (4), for applying or offering to apply physical therapy, exclusive of initial evaluation or screening and exclusive of education or consultation for the prevention of physical and mental disability within the scope of physical therapy, other than upon the referral from a licensed physician, dentist, osteopath, podiatrist, chiropractor, physician assistant or nurse practitioner; or for acting as a physical therapist assistant other than under the direct, on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist; (s)  Failing to adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession as established by rules of the board; (t)  Failing to complete continuing competence requirements as established by board rule; (u)  Failing to supervise physical therapist assistants in accordance with this chapter and/or board rules; (v)  Engaging in sexual misconduct.  For the purpose of this paragraph, sexual misconduct includes, but is not necessarily limited to: (i)  Engaging in or soliciting sexual relationships, whether consensual or nonconsensual, while a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant/patient relationship exists. (ii)  Making sexual advances, requesting sexual favors or engaging in other verbal conduct or physical contact of a sexual nature with patients or clients. (iii) Intentionally viewing a completely or partially disrobed patient in the course of treatment if the viewing is not related to patient diagnosis or treatment under current practice standards; (w)  The erroneous issuance of a license or privilege to practice to any person; (x)  Violations of any provisions of this chapter, board rules or regulations or a written order or directive of the board; (y)  Failing to maintain adequate patient records.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "adequate patient records" means legible records that contain at minimum sufficient information to identify the patient, an evaluation of objective findings, a diagnosis, a plan of care, a treatment record and a discharge plan; (z)  Failing to report to the board any unprofessional, incompetent or illegal acts that appear to be in violation of this law or any rules established by the board. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  Failure to comply with a board order to submit to a physical or mental examination shall render a licensee subject to the summary suspension procedures described in Section 73-23-64. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (5)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 8.  Section 73-25-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-29.  The grounds for the nonissuance, suspension, revocation or restriction of a license or the denial of reinstatement or renewal of a license are: (1)  Habitual personal use of narcotic drugs, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. (2)  Habitual use of intoxicating liquors, or any beverage, to an extent which affects professional competency. (3)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any narcotic drug, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability otherwise than in the course of legitimate professional practice. (4)  Conviction of violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (5)  Procuring, or attempting to procure, or aiding in, an abortion that is not medically indicated. (6)  Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (7)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or deception. (8)  Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to: (a)  Practicing medicine under a false or assumed name or impersonating another practitioner, living or dead. (b)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice medicine. (c)  Making or willfully causing to be made any flamboyant claims concerning the licensee's professional excellence. (d)  Being guilty of any dishonorable or unethical conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (e)  Obtaining a fee as personal compensation or gain from a person on fraudulent representation of a disease or injury condition generally considered incurable by competent medical authority in the light of current scientific knowledge and practice can be cured or offering, undertaking, attempting or agreeing to cure or treat the same by a secret method, which he refuses to divulge to the board upon request. (f)  Use of any false, fraudulent or forged statement or document, or the use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest or immoral practice in connection with any of the licensing requirements, including the signing in his professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he makes or signs such certificate. (g)  Failing to identify a physician's school of practice in all professional uses of his name by use of his earned degree or a description of his school of practice. (9)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice medicine in that jurisdiction or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by such licensing authority which prevents or restricts practice in that jurisdiction, a certified copy of the disciplinary order or action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (10)  Surrender of a license or authorization to practice medicine in another state or jurisdiction or surrender of membership on any medical staff or in any medical or professional association or society while under disciplinary investigation by any of those authorities or bodies for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct which would constitute grounds for action as defined in this section. (11)  Final sanctions imposed by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Inspector General or any successor federal agency or office, based upon a finding of incompetency, gross misconduct or failure to meet professionally recognized standards of health care; a certified copy of the notice of final sanction being prima facie evidence thereof.  As used in this paragraph, the term "final sanction" means the written notice to a physician from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Officer of Inspector General or any successor federal agency or office, which implements the exclusion. (12)  Failure to furnish the board, its investigators or representatives information legally requested by the board. (13)  Violation of any provision(s) of the Medical Practice Act or the rules and regulations of the board or of any order, stipulation or agreement with the board. (14)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (15)  Performing or inducing an abortion on a woman in violation of any provision of Sections 41-41-131 through 41-41-145. (16)  Performing an abortion on a pregnant woman after determining that the unborn human individual that the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable fetal heartbeat as provided in Section 41-41-34.1. (17)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. In addition to the grounds specified above, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. A physician who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 9.  Section 73-26-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-26-5.  (1)  The board shall promulgate and publish reasonable rules and regulations necessary to enable it to discharge its functions and to enforce the provisions of law regulating the practice of physician assistants.  Those rules shall include, but are not limited to:  qualifications for licensure for physician assistants; scope of practice of physician assistants; supervision of physician assistants; identification of physician assistants; grounds for disciplinary actions and discipline of physician assistants, which shall specifically include discipline for violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners; and setting and charging reasonable fees for licensure and license renewals for physician assistants.  However, nothing in this chapter or in rules adopted by the board shall authorize physician assistants to administer or monitor general inhaled anesthesia, epidural anesthesia, spinal anesthesia or monitored anesthesia as utilized in surgical procedures.  In addition, the board shall not adopt any rule or regulation or impose any requirement regarding the licensing of physician assistants that conflicts with the prohibitions in Section 73-49-3. The board shall promulgate rules for licensure and license renewals in accordance with Section 33-1-39. (2)  If the board appoints a task force or committee to address physician assistant regulation, at least one (1) member of the task force shall be a nurse practitioner who is a member of the Mississippi Board of Nursing or a nurse practitioner appointee selected by the board from a list of three (3) recommendations submitted by the Mississippi Nurses Association, and at least one (1) member shall be a physician assistant selected by the board from a list of three (3) recommendations submitted by the Mississippi Academy of Physician Assistants. (3)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 10.  Section 73-27-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-13.  (1)  The State Board of Medical Licensure may refuse to issue, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict any license provided for in this chapter, with the advice of the advisory committee, based upon the following grounds: (a)  Habitual personal use of narcotic drugs, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. (b)  Habitual use of intoxicating liquors, or any beverage, to an extent which affects professional competency. (c)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any narcotic drug, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability otherwise than in the course of legitimate professional practice. (d)  Conviction of violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law. (e)  Performing any medical diagnosis or treatment outside the scope of podiatry as defined in Section 73-27-1. (f)  Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude. (g)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or deception. (h)  Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Practicing medicine under a false or assumed name or impersonating another practitioner, living or dead. (ii)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice podiatry. (iii)  Making or willfully causing to be made any flamboyant claims concerning the licensee's professional excellence. (iv)  Being guilty of any dishonorable or unethical conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (v)  Obtaining a fee as personal compensation or gain from a person on fraudulent representation a disease or injury condition generally considered incurable by competent medical authority in the light of current scientific knowledge and practice can be cured or offering, undertaking, attempting or agreeing to cure or treat the same by a secret method, which he refuses to divulge to the board upon request. (vi)  Use of any false, fraudulent or forged statement or document, or the use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest or immoral practice in connection with any of the licensing requirements, including the signing in his professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he makes or signs such certificate. (vii)  Failing to identify a podiatrist's school of practice in all professional uses of his name by use of his earned degree or a description of his school of practice. (i)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice podiatry in that state or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by such licensing authority which prevents or restricts practice in that state. (j)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  Upon the nonissuance, suspension or revocation of a license to practice podiatry, the board may, in its discretion and with the advice of the advisory committee, reissue a license after a lapse of six (6) months.  No advertising shall be permitted except regular professional cards. (3)  In its investigation of whether the license of a podiatrist should be suspended, revoked or otherwise restricted, the board may inspect patient records in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-25-28. (4)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (5)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 11.  Section 73-31-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-31-21.  (1)  The board, by an affirmative vote of at least four (4) of its seven (7) members, shall withhold, deny, revoke or suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with the provisions of this article, or otherwise discipline a licensed psychologist, upon proof that the applicant or licensed psychologist: (a)  Has violated the current code of ethics of the American Psychological Association or other codes of ethical standards adopted by the board; or (b)  Has been convicted of a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof; or (c)  Is using any substance or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to any other person or the public, or to an extent that the use impairs his or her ability to perform the work of a professional psychologist with safety to the public; or (d)  Has impersonated another person holding a psychologist license or allowed another person to use his or her license; or (e)  Has used fraud or deception in applying for a license or in taking an examination provided for in this article; or (f)  Has accepted commissions or rebates or other forms of remuneration for referring clients to other professional persons; or (g)  Has performed psychological services outside of the area of his or her training, experience or competence; or (h)  Has allowed his or her name or license issued under this article to be used in connection with any person or persons who perform psychological services outside of the area of their training, experience or competence; or (i)  Is legally adjudicated mentally incompetent, the record of that adjudication being conclusive evidence thereof; or (j)  Has willfully or negligently violated any of the provisions of this article.  The board may recover from any person disciplined under this article, the costs of investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of the disciplinary action. (2)  Notice shall be effected by registered mail or personal service setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of the mailing or that service, at which time the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.  For the purpose of the hearing, the board, acting by and through its executive secretary, may subpoena persons and papers on its own behalf and on behalf of the applicant or licensee, may administer oaths and may take testimony.  That testimony, when properly transcribed, together with the papers and exhibits, shall be admissible in evidence for or against the applicant or licensee.  At the hearing, the applicant or licensee may appear by counsel and personally in his or her own behalf.  Any person sworn and examined by a witness in the hearing shall not be held to answer criminally, nor shall any papers or documents produced by the witness be competent evidence in any criminal proceedings against the witness other than for perjury in delivering his or her evidence.  On the basis of any such hearing, or upon default of applicant or licensee, the board shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  A copy of that determination shall be sent by registered mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee.  The decision of the board denying, revoking or suspending the license shall become final thirty (30) days after so mailed or served, unless within that period the applicant or licensee appeals the decision to the chancery court, under the provisions hereof, and the proceedings in chancery shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  All proceedings and evidence, together with exhibits, presented at the hearing before the board shall be admissible in evidence in court in the appeal. (3)  The board may subpoena persons and papers on its own behalf and on behalf of the respondent, may administer oaths and may compel the testimony of witnesses.  It may issue commissions to take testimony, and testimony so taken and sworn to shall be admissible in evidence for and against the respondent.  The board shall be entitled to the assistance of the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation, which, on petition by the board, shall issue ancillary subpoenas and petitions and may punish as for contempt of court in the event of noncompliance therewith. (4)  Every order and judgment of the board shall take effect immediately on its promulgation unless the board in the order or judgment fixes a probationary period for the applicant or  licensee.  The order and judgment shall continue in effect unless upon appeal the court by proper order or decree terminates it earlier.  The board may make public its order and judgments in  any manner and form as it deems proper.  It shall, in event of the suspension or revocation of a license, direct the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which that license was recorded to cancel that record. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or revoking the authority of any court or of any licensing or registering officer or board, other than the Mississippi Board of Psychology, to suspend, revoke and reinstate licenses and to cancel registrations under the provisions of Section 41-29-311. (6)  Suspension by the board of the license of a psychologist shall be for a period not exceeding one (1) year.  At the end of this period the board shall reevaluate the suspension, and shall either reinstate or revoke the license.  A person whose license has been revoked under the provisions of this section may reapply for a license after more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date that the denial or revocation is legally effective. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (8)  The board may issue a nondisciplinary, educational letter to licensees as provided in Section 73-31-7(2)(g). The board may also direct a psychologist to obtain a formal assessment of ability to practice safely if there is reason to believe there may be impairment due to substance abuse or mental incapacity.  Licensees who may be impaired, but who are able to practice safely, may be required by the board to seek appropriate treatment and/or supervision.  That action by the board in itself will not be considered disciplinary. (9)  The board may discipline any person who has been granted the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or the temporary authorization to practice under the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact provided for under Section 73-31-51, for any of the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section in the same manner as the board disciplines a licensed psychologist under this section. (10)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 12.  Section 73-39-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-77.  (1) Upon a written complaint sworn to by any person, the board, in its sole discretion, may, after a hearing, revoke, suspend or limit for a certain time a license, impose an administrative fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each separate offense, or otherwise discipline any licensed veterinarian for any of the following reasons: (a)  The employment of fraud, misrepresentation or deception in obtaining a license. (b)  The inability to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental disability, including deterioration of mental capacity, loss of motor skills or abuse of drugs or alcohol of sufficient degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent patient care. (c)  The use of advertising or solicitation that is false or misleading. (d)  Conviction of the following in any federal court or in the courts of this state or any other jurisdiction, regardless of whether the sentence is deferred: (i)  Any felony; (ii)  Any crime involving cruelty, abuse or neglect of animals, including bestiality; (iii)  Any crime of moral turpitude; (iv)  Any crime involving unlawful sexual contact, child abuse, the use or threatened use of a weapon, the infliction of injury, indecent exposure, perjury, false reporting, criminal impersonation, forgery and any other crime involving a lack of truthfulness, veracity or honesty, intimidation of a victim or witness, larceny, or alcohol or drugs. For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall be considered as a conviction. (e)  Incompetence, gross negligence or other malpractice in the practice of veterinary medicine. (f)  Aiding the unlawful practice of veterinary medicine. (g)  Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any test for disease in animals. (h)  Failure to report, as required by law, or making false or misleading report of, any contagious or infectious disease. (i)  Failure to keep accurate patient records. (j)  Dishonesty or gross negligence in the performance of food safety inspections or in the issuance of any health or inspection certificates. (k)  Failure to keep veterinary premises and equipment, including practice vehicles, in a clean and sanitary condition. (l)  Failure to permit the board or its agents to enter and inspect veterinary premises and equipment, including practice vehicles, as set by rules promulgated by the board. (m)  Revocation, suspension or limitation of a license to practice veterinary medicine by another state, territory or district of the United States. (n)  Loss or suspension of accreditation by any federal or state agency. (o)  Unprofessional conduct as defined in regulations adopted by the board. (p)  The dispensing, distribution, prescription or administration of any veterinary prescription drug, or the extralabel use of any drug in the absence of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship. (q)  Violations of state or federal drug laws. (r)  Violations of any order of the board. (s)  Violations of this chapter or of the rules promulgated under this chapter. (t)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  A certified copy of any judgment of conviction or finding of guilt by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental agency, or agency authorized to issue licenses or permits, including the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, the Mississippi Board of Animal Health and the Mississippi Board of Health, of a veterinarian or veterinary technician of any matters listed in this section shall be admissible in evidence in any hearing held by the board to discipline such veterinarian or technician and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the commission of any such act. (3)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 13.  Section 73-71-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-71-33.  (1)  The following acts constitute grounds for which the board may initiate disciplinary actions: (a)  Attempting to obtain, or renewing a license to practice acupuncture by bribery or misinterpretation; (b)  Having a license to practice acupuncture revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, including the denial of licensure by the licensing authority of another state or territory for reasons that would preclude licensure in this state; (c)  Being convicted or found guilty, regardless of adjudication, in any jurisdiction of a felony, or a crime of moral turpitude, or a crime that directly relates to acupuncture.  For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall be considered as a conviction; (d)  Advertising, practicing, or attempting to practice under a name other than one's own; (e)  The use of advertising or solicitation that is false or misleading; (f)  Aiding, assisting, procuring, employing or advertising an unlicensed person to practice acupuncture contrary to this chapter or a rule of the board; (g)  Failing to perform any statutory or legal obligation placed upon an acupuncture practitioner; (h)  Making or filing a report that the licensee knows to be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file a report required by state or federal law, willfully impeding or obstructing that filing or inducing another person to do so.  Those reports shall include only those that are signed in the capacity of an acupuncture practitioner; (i)  Exercising coercion, intimidation or undue influence in entering into sexual relations with a patient, or continuing the patient-practitioner relationship with a patient with whom the licensee has sexual relations, if those sexual relations cause the licensee to perform services incompetently.  This paragraph shall not apply to sexual relations between acupuncture practitioners and their spouses; (j)  Making deceptive, untrue or fraudulent misrepresentations in the practice of acupuncture; (k)  Soliciting patients, either personally or through an agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation or undue influence, or a form of overreaching conduct; (l)  Failing to keep written medical records justifying the course of treatment of the patient; (m)  Exercising undue influence on the patient to exploit the patient for financial gain of the licensee or of a third party; (n)  Being unable to practice acupuncture with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or intemperate use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition; (o)  Malpractice or the failure to practice acupuncture to that level of care, skill and treatment that is recognized by a reasonably prudent similar practitioner of acupuncture as being acceptable under similar conditions and circumstances; (p)  Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law or accepting or performing professional responsibilities that the licensee knows or has reason to know that he or she is not qualified by training, experience or certification to perform; (q)  Delegating professional responsibilities to a person when the licensee delegating those responsibilities knows, or has reason to know, that the person is not qualified by training, experience or licensure to perform them; (r)  Violating any provision of this chapter, a rule of the board, or a lawful order of the board previously entered in a disciplinary hearing or failing to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board; (s)  Conspiring with another to commit an act, or committing an act, that coerces, intimidates or precludes another licensee from lawfully advertising or providing his or her services; (t)  Fraud or deceit, or gross negligence, incompetence or misconduct in the operation of a course of study; (u)  Failing to comply with state, county or municipal regulations or reporting requirements relating to public health and the control of contagious and infectious disease; (v)  Failing to comply with any rule of the board relating to health and safety, including, but not limited to, sterilization of equipment and the disposal of potentially infectious materials; (w)  Incompetence, gross negligence or other malpractice in the practice of acupuncture; (x)  Aiding the unlawful practice of acupuncture; (y)  Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any test for disease; (z)  Failure to report, as required by law, or making false or misleading report of, any contagious or infectious disease; (aa)  Failure to keep accurate patient records; or (bb)  Failure to permit the board or its agents to enter and inspect acupuncture premises and equipment as set by rules promulgated by the board. (2)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 14.  Section 73-75-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-75-19.  License denial, suspension, or revocation.  (1)  The board, by an affirmative vote of at least three (3) of its five (5) members, shall withhold, deny, revoke or suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or otherwise discipline a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst upon finding that the applicant or licensee: (a)  Has violated the current Behavior Analyst Certification Board Professional Disciplinary and Ethical Standards, the Behavior Analyst Certification Board Guidelines for Responsible Conduct for Behavior Analysts, or other codes of ethical standards adopted by the board, or has lost or failed to renew certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board; or (b)  Has been convicted of a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof; or (c)  Is using any narcotic or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to any other person or the public, or to an extent that such use impairs his ability to perform the work of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst; or (d)  Has impersonated another person holding a license issued under this chapter or allowed another person to use his license; or (e)  Has used fraud or deception in applying for a license provided for in this chapter; or (f)  Has accepted commissions or rebates or other forms of remuneration for referring clients to other professional persons; or (g)  Has allowed his name or license issued under this chapter to be used in connection with any person or persons who perform applied behavior analysis services outside the area of their training, experience or competence; or (h)  Is legally adjudicated mentally incompetent, the record of such adjudication being conclusive evidence thereof; or (i)  Has willfully or negligently violated any of the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The board may recover from any person disciplined under this chapter the costs of investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of the disciplinary action. (3)  Notice shall be effected by registered mail or personal service setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of such mailing or such service, at which time the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.  For the purpose of such hearing the board, acting by and through its executive secretary, may exercise all authority granted to conduct investigations and hearings pursuant to Section 73-75-9(2)(a) and (b).  At such hearing the applicant or licensee may appear by counsel and personally on his own behalf.  On the basis of any such hearing, or upon default of applicant or licensee, the board shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  A copy of such determination shall be sent by registered mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee.  The decision of the board denying, revoking or suspending the license shall become final thirty (30) days after so mailed or served unless within that period the licensee appeals the decision to the Chancery Court of Madison or Rankin Counties, pursuant to the provisions hereof, and the proceedings in chancery shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  All proceedings and evidence, together with exhibits, presented at such hearing before the board in the event of appeal, shall be admissible in evidence in the court. (4)  Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit the board from immediately suspending any license prior to a hearing under subsection (3) of this section, when in its sole discretion the suspension is required for the instruction, safety or well-being of any member of the public. (5)  Every order and judgment of the board shall take effect immediately upon its promulgation unless the board in such order or judgment fixes a probationary period for applicant or licensee.  Such order and judgment shall continue in effect unless upon appeal the court by proper order or decree terminates it earlier.  The board may make public its order and judgments in such manner and form as it deems proper. (6)  Suspension by the board of a license issued under this chapter shall be for a period not to exceed one (1) year.  At the end of this period the board shall reevaluate the suspension, and shall either reinstate or revoke the license.  A person whose license has been revoked under the provisions of this section may reapply for license after more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date such revocation is legally effective. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, in compliance with the procedures set forth in Sections 93-11-151 through 93-11-163. (8)  The board shall be subject to the limits on disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-49-5. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.